Alaska statutes. Title 42. Public Utilities and Carriers and Energy Programs.
Article 3. Administrative Provisions.

Sec. 42.40.150.
Meetings of the board.

The chairman of the board shall call meetings of the board at least once every three months. The chairman or a majority of the members of the board may call other meetings of the board as necessary. The chairman shall preside at meetings.

Except for executive sessions, the meetings of the board are public. The board shall provide by rule for a method of providing reasonable notice to the public of its meetings.

The board shall keep minutes of each meeting.

History.

(§ 2 ch 153 SLA 1984)

Sec. 42.40.160.
Quorum and voting.

Four voting members of the board constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.

Four affirmative votes are required for board action. The board shall provide by rule for the manner of voting, except that the board may not provide for voting by proxy. The rules may provide for voting and conferring by telecommunication devices.

History.

(§ 2 ch 153 SLA 1984)

Sec. 42.40.170.
Executive sessions.

The question of holding an executive session shall be determined in accordance with AS

42.40.160

. A subject may not be considered at an executive session unless it is mentioned in the motion calling for the executive session or is auxiliary to a subject mentioned. An action may not be taken at an executive session.

Only the following subjects may be discussed in an executive session:

matters, the immediate knowledge of which would clearly have an adverse effect upon the finances of the corporation;

unless the person has requested to have the subjects discussed in public, subjects that tend to prejudice the reputation and character of a person;

matters that, by law or municipal charter or ordinance, are permitted to be kept confidential from public disclosure;

matters pertaining to personnel;

matters pertaining to the corporation’s legal position;

land acquisition or disposal; and

proprietary or other information of a type treated as confidential under the standards and practices of the United States Surface Transportation Board, including practices that protect information associated with specific shippers, divisions, and contract rate agreements.

History.

(§ 2 ch 153 SLA 1984; am § 41 ch 40 SLA 2008)

Sec. 42.40.180.
Rules.

The board shall adopt rules to carry out its functions and the purposes of this chapter, including rules to safeguard property owned, managed, or transported by the corporation and to protect employees and persons using the corporation’s property or services. At least 15 days before the adoption of a rule, the board shall give public notice of the proposed action by publishing a notice in at least three newspapers of general circulation in the state and by mailing a copy of the notice to each person who has requested notice of proposed changes to rules. The notice must state the time, place, and nature of the proceedings and must contain a summary of the subject of the proposed rule.

On the date and at the time and place designated in the notice required under (a) of this section the board shall provide each interested person an opportunity to present statements in writing concerning the proposed rule and shall give members of the public an opportunity to present oral statements for a total period of at least one hour.

The board shall consider all relevant matters presented to it before adopting a rule. The board may take action on a rule that varies in content from the summary provided with the notice of the proposed rule if the subject of the rule was reflected in the summary and it provided reasonable notice to the public as to whether their interests could be affected by the board’s action on that subject.

The board shall establish in the bylaws of the corporation additional procedures for adopting rules if necessary.

History.

(§ 2 ch 153 SLA 1984)

Sec. 42.40.190.
Emergency rules.

The board shall establish in the bylaws of the corporation a procedure for the adoption of a rule on an emergency basis. An emergency rule may be adopted only when necessary for the orderly operation of the corporation’s facilities or programs. The requirements of AS

42.40.180

do not apply to actions taken under this section. However, within 10 days after the adoption of a rule on an emergency basis the board shall give notice of its action that substantially complies with the notice requirements of AS

42.40.180(a)

.

An action taken under this section remains in effect for not more than 120 days. To prevent an emergency rule from lapsing the board may adopt the same rule under AS

42.40.180

before the end of the 120-day period.

History.

(§ 2 ch 153 SLA 1984)

Sec. 42.40.200.
Validity of rules.

Failure to mail notice to a person under AS

42.40.180(a)

or

42.40.190(a)

does not invalidate an action taken by the board.

An interested person may challenge a rule adopted by the board by bringing an action in the superior court. In addition to other grounds, a court may declare a change invalid

for substantial failure by the board to comply with AS

42.40.180

or

42.40.190

; or

if the rule was adopted under AS

42.40.190

, upon the grounds that the emergency rule was not necessary for the orderly operation of the corporation’s facilities or programs.

History.

(§ 2 ch 153 SLA 1984)

Sec. 42.40.205.
Application of AS 42.40.180 and 42.40.190.

Adoption of a rule is not subject to AS

42.40.180

or

42.40.190

if it

relates only to the internal management of the corporation;

relates to specific rates, tariffs, divisions, and contract rate agreements;

relates to service schedules of the railroad;

is directed to a specifically named person or to a group of persons and does not apply to the general public; or

relates to the use of public works under the jurisdiction of the corporation if the effect of the order is indicated to the public by means of signs or signals.

History.

(§ 2 ch 153 SLA 1984)

Sec. 42.40.210.
Previously adopted rules and orders.

The board may provide by resolution that rules and orders in effect on the date of transfer remain in effect until amended or repealed by the board.
AS

42.40.180

does not apply to actions taken under this section.

History.

(§ 2 ch 153 SLA 1984)

Sec. 42.40.220.
Public disclosure of information.

Except as provided under (b) of this section, information in the possession of the corporation is public and is open to public inspection at reasonable times.

The corporation may by rule designate and withhold public disclosure of matters of a privileged or proprietary nature. Those matters include personnel records, communications with and work product of legal counsel, and, consistent with the standards and practices of the United States Surface Transportation Board for the protection of these matters, other information including proprietary information associated with specific shippers, divisions, and contract rate agreements.

History.

(§ 2 ch 153 SLA 1984; am § 42 ch 40 SLA 2008)

Sec. 42.40.230.
Conflicts of interest. [Repealed, §§ 103, 198 ch 74 SLA 1998.]